Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-322
Special engineer; when employed.

The mayor and city council of a city of the first class may, whenever they deem it expedient, employ a special engineer to make or assist in making any particular estimate or survey, and any estimate or survey made by such special engineer shall have the same validity and serve in all respects as though the same had been made by the city engineer.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 98, p. 297;

R.S.1913, § 4888;

C.S.1922, § 4056;

C.S.1929, § 16-318;

R.S.1943, § 16-322;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 64;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 17.